California statutes. Labor Code
(l) Pursuant to the Labor Commissioner’s citation authority, a customer or a port drayage motor carrier shall provide to the Labor Commissioner any information within its possession, custody, or control required to verify compliance with applicable state laws. Upon request, the records that contain this information shall be made available promptly for inspection, and the Labor Commissioner shall be permitted
 to copy them.

(m) The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations and rules of practice and procedure necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of subdivisions (c) and (l) that are under their jurisdiction.

(n) The Employment Development Department may adopt regulations and rules of practice and procedure necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of subdivision (c) that are under its jurisdiction.

(o) A waiver of this section is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(p) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 2754)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.5.

(a) (1) At the time of hiring, an employer shall provide to each employee a written notice, in the language the employer normally uses to communicate employment-related information to the employee, containing the following information:

(A) The rate or rates of pay and basis thereof, whether paid by the hour, shift, day, week, salary, piece, commission, or otherwise, including any rates for overtime, as applicable.

(B) Allowances, if any, claimed as part of the minimum wage, including meal or lodging allowances.

(C) The regular payday designated
 by the employer in accordance with the requirements of this code.

(D) The name of the employer, including any “doing business as” names used by the employer.

(E) The physical address of the employer’s main office or principal place of business, and a mailing address, if different.

(F) The telephone number of the employer.

(G) The name, address, and telephone number of the employer’s workers’ compensation insurance carrier.

(H) That an employee: may accrue and use sick leave; has a right to request and use accrued paid sick leave; may not be terminated or retaliated against for using or requesting the use
 of accrued paid sick leave; and has the right to file a complaint against an employer who retaliates.

(I) The existence of a federal or state emergency or disaster declaration applicable to the county or counties where the employee is to be employed, and that was issued within 30 days before the employee’s first day of employment, that may affect their health and safety during their employment. 

(J) Any other information the Labor Commissioner deems material and necessary.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall prepare
 templates for the required notices that comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (4). The templates shall be made available to employers in a manner as determined by the Labor
 Commissioner, and as set forth in subdivision (d). Commencing March 1, 2024, the template developed pursuant to paragraph (4) shall be posted on the Labor Commissioner’s internet website.

(3) If the employer is a temporary services employer, as defined in Section 201.3, the notice described in paragraph (1) shall also include the name, the physical address of the main office, the mailing address if different from the physical address of the main office, and the telephone number of the legal entity for whom the employee will perform work, and any other information the Labor Commissioner deems material and necessary. The requirements of this paragraph do not apply to a security services company that is licensed by the Department of Consumer Affairs and that solely provides security services.

(4) (A) If an employee is admitted under the federal H-2A agricultural visa program pursuant to Section 1188 of Title 8 of the United States Code, the notice described in paragraph (1) shall also include, in Spanish, a separate and distinct section containing nonduplicative information succinctly describing an agricultural employee’s additional rights and protections under California law and regulations, including, but not limited to, information addressing the federal H-2A program wage rate required to be paid during the contract period; overtime wage rates; frequency of pay; pay for piece rate workers; 10-minute rest periods; 30-minute meal periods; transportation travel time compensation when required, including transportation from housing to work sites; employee housing rights; nonretaliation protections for complaints
 or organizing; contents of itemized wage statements; sexual harassment prohibitions; toilets; requirements regarding availability of potable water and handwashing facilities; requirements relating to hot weather working conditions and the availability of shade; pesticide exposure protections; workplace safety requirements, training and correction of hazards; transportation in defined farm labor vehicles; prohibitions against tool or equipment charges, prohibitions against deductions for meals not taken; training and necessary equipment and lighting for night work; prohibitions against use of short-handled hoes and limits on hand weeding; employee-paid health insurance; right to accrue and take sick leave; workers’ compensation coverage, disability pay, and medical care for injuries; and the right to complain to state or federal agencies and to seek advice from collective bargaining representatives
 or legal assistance organizations.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an employer shall provide the notice required by subparagraph (A) in Spanish to the H-2A employee on the day that the H-2A employee begins work in the state or on the first day that the employee begins work for another H-2A employer. An H-2A employee may request that the employer also provide the notice in English.

(ii) An employer who employs both H-2A and non-H-2A employees at the same time may satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) with respect to the employer’s non-H-2A employees by opting to provide those employees with the notice required by subparagraph (A) or by providing the notice required by paragraph (1).

(b) An employer shall notify their employees in writing of any changes to the information set forth in the notice within seven calendar days after the time of the changes, unless one of the following applies:

(1) All changes are reflected on a timely wage statement furnished in accordance with Section 226.

(2) Notice of all changes is provided in another writing required by
 law within seven days of the changes.

(c) For purposes of this section, “employee” does not include any of the following:

(1) An employee directly employed by the state or any political subdivision thereof, including any city, county, city and county, or special district.

(2) An employee who is exempt from the payment of overtime wages by statute or the wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(3) An employee who is covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of the employee, and if the agreement provides premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked
 and a regular hourly rate of pay for those employees of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage. This subdivision applies to employees admitted to the federal H-2A program only if the collective bargaining agreement provides for wage rates of not less than the federal H-2A program wage required to be paid during the contract period.

(d) Commencing March 15, 2024, an employer of an employee admitted pursuant to the federal H-2A agricultural visa program shall comply with subdivision (a) by giving workers a copy of the template developed by the Labor Commissioner in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (AB 636)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.7.

(a) An employer shall notify an employee who participates in a flexible spending account, including, but not limited to, a dependent care flexible spending account, a health flexible spending account, or adoption assistance flexible spending account, of any deadline to withdraw funds before the end of the plan year. Notice shall be by two
 different forms, one of which may be electronic.

(b) Notices made pursuant to subdivision (a) may include, but are not limited to the following:

(1) Electronic mail communication.

(2) Telephone communication.

(3) Text message notification.

(4) Postal mail notification.

(5) In-person notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (AB 1554)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Airport” means any area of land or water used or intended for landing or takeoff of aircraft including appurtenant area used or intended for airport buildings, facilities, as well as rights-of-way together with the buildings and facilities within the State of California, excluding any military base or federally operated facility.

(2) “Airport hospitality operation” means a business that prepares, delivers, inspects, or provides any other service in connection with the preparation of food or beverage for aircraft crew or passengers at an airport, or that provides food and beverage, retail, or other consumer goods or services to the
 public at an airport. The term airport hospitality operation does not include an air carrier certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration.

(3) “Airport service provider” means a business that performs, under contract with a passenger air carrier, airport facility management, or airport authority, functions on the property of the airport that are directly related to the air transportation of persons, property, or mail, including, but not limited to, the loading and unloading of property on aircraft, assistance to passengers under Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.1) of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, security, airport ticketing and check-in functions, ground-handling of aircraft, aircraft cleaning and sanitization functions, and waste removal. The term “airport service provider” does not include an air carrier certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration.

(4) “Building service” means janitorial, building maintenance, or security services.

(5) “Employee” means any individual who in a particular week performs at least two hours of work for an employer.

(6) “Employer” means any person, including a corporate officer or executive, who directly or indirectly or through an agent or any other person, including through the services of a temporary service or staffing agency or similar entity, owns or operates an enterprise and employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of any employee. “Employer” also means the successor employer as set forth under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b).

(7) “Enterprise” means a hotel, private club, event center, airport hospitality operation, airport service provider, or the provision of building service
 to office, retail, or other commercial buildings.

(8) “Event center” means a publicly or privately owned structure of more than 50,000 square feet or 1,000 seats that is used for the purposes of public performances, sporting events, business meetings, or similar events, and includes concert halls, stadiums, sports arenas, racetracks, coliseums, and convention centers. The term “event center” also includes any contracted, leased, or sublet premises connected to or operated in conjunction with the event center’s purpose, including food preparation facilities, concessions, retail stores, restaurants, bars, and structured parking facilities.

(9) “Hotel” means a residential building that is designated or used for lodging and other related services for the public, and containing 50 or more guest rooms, or suites of rooms (adjoining rooms do not constitute a suite of rooms). “Hotel” also
 includes any contracted, leased, or sublet premises connected to or operated in conjunction with the building’s purpose, or providing services at the building. The number of guest rooms, or suites of rooms, shall be calculated based on the room count on the opening of the hotel or on December 31, 2019 whichever is greater.

(10) “Laid-off employee” means any employee who was employed by the employer for six months or more and whose most recent separation from active employment by the employer 

 occurred on or after March 4, 2020, and was due to a reason related to the COVID-19 pandemic, including a public health directive, government shutdown order, lack of business, a reduction in force, or other economic, nondisciplinary reason due to the COVID-19 pandemic. There shall be a presumption that a separation due to a lack of business, reduction in force, or other economic, nondisciplinary reason is due to
 a reason related to the COVID-19 pandemic, unless the employer establishes otherwise by a preponderance of the evidence.

(11) “Length of service” means the total of all periods of time during which an employee has been in active service with the employer, based on the employee’s date of hire, including periods of time when the employee was on leave or on vacation.

(12) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign.

(13) “Private club” means a private, membership-based business or nonprofit organization that operates a building or complex of buildings containing at least 50 guest
 rooms or suites of rooms that are offered as overnight lodging to members. The number of guest rooms or suites of rooms shall be calculated based on the room count on the opening of the private club or on December 31, 2019, whichever is greater.

(b) (1) Within five business days of establishing a position, an employer shall offer its laid-off employees in writing, either by hand or to their last known physical address, and by email and text message to the extent the employer possesses such information, all job positions that become available after the effective date of this section for which the laid-off employees are qualified. A laid-off employee is qualified for a position if the employee held the same or similar position at the enterprise at the time of the employee’s most recent layoff with the employer.

(2) The employer shall offer positions to laid-off
 employees in an order of preference subject to paragraph (1) and this paragraph. If more than one employee is entitled to preference for a position, the employer shall offer the position to the laid-off employee with the greatest length of service based on the employee’s date of hire for the enterprise.

(3) A laid-off employee who is offered a position pursuant to this section shall be given at least five business days, from the date of receipt, in which to accept or decline the offer. A “business day” is any day except Saturday, Sunday, or any official state holiday. An employer may make simultaneous, conditional offers of employment to laid-off employees, with a final offer of employment conditioned on application of the preference system set forth in paragraph (2).

(4) An employer must retain the following records for at least three years, measured from the date of the written
 notice regarding the layoff, for each laid-off employee: the employee’s full legal name; the employee’s job classification at the time of separation from employment; the employee’s date of hire; the employee’s last known address of residence; the employee’s last known email address; the employee’s last known telephone number; and a copy of the written notices regarding the layoff provided to the employee and all records of communications between the employer and the employee concerning offers of employment made to the employee pursuant to this section.

(5) An employer that declines to recall a laid-off employee on the grounds of lack of qualifications and instead hires someone other than a laid-off employee shall provide the laid-off employee a written notice within 30 days including the length of service with the employer of those hired in lieu of that recall, along with all reasons for the decision.

(6) This section also applies in any of the following circumstances:

(A) The ownership of the employer changed after the separation from employment of a laid-off employee but the enterprise is conducting the same or similar operations as before the COVID-19 state of emergency.

(B) The form of organization of the employer changed after the COVID-19 state of emergency.

(C) Substantially all of the assets of the employer were acquired by another entity that conducts the same or similar operations using substantially the same assets.

(D) The employer relocates the operations at which a laid-off employee was employed before the COVID-19 state of emergency to a different location.

(c) No employer shall refuse to employ, terminate, reduce in compensation, or otherwise take any adverse action against any laid-off employee as defined in subdivision (a) for seeking to enforce their rights under this section, for participating in proceedings related to this section, opposing any practice proscribed by this section, or otherwise asserting rights under this section. This subdivision shall also apply to any employee or laid-off employee who mistakenly, but in good faith, alleges noncompliance with this section.

(d) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall have exclusive jurisdiction to enforce this section. This section may be enforced only as follows:

(1) A laid-off employee may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement for violations of this section and may be awarded
 any or all of the following, as appropriate:

(A) Hiring and reinstatement rights pursuant to this section.

(B) Frontpay or backpay for each day during which the violation continues, which shall be calculated at a rate of compensation not less than the highest of any of the following rates:

(i) The average regular rate of pay received by the laid-off employee during the last three years of that employee’s employment in the same occupation classification.

(ii) The most recent regular rate received by the laid-off employee while employed by the employer.

(iii) The regular rate received by an employee occupying the position in place of the laid-off employee that should have been employed.

(C) Value of the benefits the laid-off employee would have received under the employer’s benefit plan.

(2) No criminal penalties shall be imposed for violation of this section.

(3) Any employer, agent of the employer, or other person who violates or causes to be violated the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each employee whose rights under these provisions are violated and an additional sum payable as liquidated damages in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500), per employee, for each day the rights of an employee under this section are violated and continuing until such time as the violation is cured, which shall be recovered by the Labor Commissioner, deposited into the Labor and Workforce Development Fund, and paid to the employee as compensatory
 damages.

(4) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section, including investigating an alleged violation and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing, through the procedures set forth in Section 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including by issuance of a citation against an employer who violates this section and by filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as appropriate.

(5) In an action brought by the Labor Commissioner for enforcement of this section, the court may issue preliminary and permanent injunctive relief to vindicate the rights of employees.

(6) In an administrative or civil action brought under this section, the Labor Commissioner or court, as the case may be, shall award interest on all amounts due and unpaid at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code.

(7) The remedies, penalties, and procedures provided under this section are cumulative.

(e) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement may promulgate and enforce rules and regulations, and issue determinations and interpretations, consistent with and necessary for the implementation of this section. Those rules and regulations, determinations, and interpretations shall have the force of law and may be relied upon by employers, employees, and other persons to determine their rights and responsibilities under this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local governmental agency from enacting ordinances that impose greater standards than, or establish additional enforcement provisions to, those prescribed by this section. This section shall not be construed to limit a discharged employee or eligible employee’s right to bring a common law cause of action for wrongful termination.

(g) All of the provisions of this section, or any part of this section, may be waived in a valid collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is explicitly set forth in that agreement in clear and unambiguous terms. Unilateral implementation of terms and conditions of employment by either party to a collective bargaining relationship shall not constitute or be permitted as a waiver of all or any part of the provisions of this section.

(h) The
 provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2027.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a violation of this section occurring on or before December 31, 2026, shall continue to be enforceable pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (AB 858)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Electronic Employment Verification Systems [2811. - 2814.]

2811.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Employment Acceleration Act of 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

Except as required by federal law, or as a condition of receiving federal funds, neither the state nor a city, county, city and county, or special district shall require an employer to use an electronic employment verification system, including under the following circumstances:

(a) As a condition of receiving a government contract.

(b) As a condition of applying for or maintaining a business license.

(c) As a penalty for violating licensing or other similar laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Electronic employment verification system” means an employment verification system that allows employers to electronically verify workers’ employment authorization with the federal government. This includes the Basic Pilot Program, enacted by Section 404 of Public Law 104-208 and renamed in 2007 as the E-Verify Program, and other pilot programs for electronic employment eligibility confirmation. The term “electronic employment verification system” does not include the I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification form or any other employment eligibility systems that are required by federal law.

(b) “Employer” means an employer other than the state, or a city, county, city and county, or special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

(a) (1) Except as required by federal law or as a condition of receiving federal funds, it shall be unlawful for an employer, or any other person or entity to use the federal electronic employment verification system known as E-Verify to check the employment authorization status of an existing employee or an applicant who has not been offered employment at a time or in a manner not required under subsection (b) of Section 1324a of Title 8 of the United States
 Code or not authorized under any federal agency memorandum of understanding governing the use of a federal electronic employment verification system.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an employer from utilizing the federal E-Verify system, in accordance with federal law, to check the employment authorization status of a person who has been offered employment.

(b) Upon using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment authorization status
 of a person, if the employer receives a tentative nonconfirmation issued by the Social Security Administration or the United States Department of Homeland Security, which indicates the information entered in E-Verify did not match federal records, the employer shall comply with the required employee notification procedures under any memorandum of understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system. The employer shall furnish to the employee any notification issued by the Social Security Administration or the United States Department of Homeland Security containing information specific to the employee’s E-Verify case or any tentative nonconfirmation notice. The notification shall be furnished
 as soon as practicable.

(c) In addition to other remedies available, an employer who violates this section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this section. Each unlawful use of the E-Verify system on an employee or applicant constitutes a separate violation.

(d) This section is intended to prevent discrimination in employment rather than to sanction the potential hiring and
 employment of persons who are not authorized for employment under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (AB 622)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Obligations of Employee [2850. - 2866.]

2850.

One who, without consideration, undertakes to do a service for another, is not bound to perform the same but if he actually enters upon its performance, he shall use at least slight care and diligence therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2851.

One who, by his own special request, induces another to intrust him with the performance of a service, shall perform the same fully. In other cases, one who undertakes a gratuitous service may relinquish it at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2852.

A gratuitous employee, who accepts a written power of attorney, shall act under it so long as it remains in force, or until he gives notice to his employer that he will not do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2853.

One who is employed at his own request to do that which is more for his own advantage than for that of his employer, shall use great care and diligence therein to protect the interest of the employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.

One who, for a good consideration, agrees to serve another, shall perform the service, and shall use ordinary care and diligence therein, so long as he is thus employed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2855.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a contract to render personal service, other than a contract of apprenticeship as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070), may not be enforced against the employee beyond seven years from the commencement of service under it. Any contract, otherwise valid, to perform or render service of a special, unique, unusual, extraordinary, or intellectual character, which gives it peculiar value and the loss of which cannot be reasonably or adequately compensated in damages in an action at law, may nevertheless be enforced against the person contracting to render the service, for a term not to exceed seven years from the commencement of service under it. If the employee voluntarily continues to serve under it beyond that time, the contract may be referred to as affording a presumptive measure of the compensation.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a):

(1) Any employee who is a party to a contract to render personal service in the production of phonorecords in which sounds are first fixed, as defined in Section 101 of Title 17 of the United States Code, may not invoke the provisions of subdivision (a) without first giving written notice to the employer in accordance with Section 1020 of the Code of Civil Procedure, specifying that the employee from and after a future date certain specified in the notice will no longer render service under the contract by reason of subdivision (a).

(2) Any party to a contract described in paragraph (1) shall have the right to recover damages for a breach of the contract occurring during its term in an action commenced during or after its term, but within the applicable period prescribed by law.

(3) If a party to a contract described in paragraph (1) is, or could contractually be, required to render personal service in the production of a specified quantity of the phonorecords and fails to render all of the required service prior to the date specified in the notice provided in paragraph (1), the party damaged by the failure shall have the right to recover damages for each phonorecord as to which that party has failed to render service in an action that, notwithstanding paragraph (2), shall be commenced within 45 days after the date specified in the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 487.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2856.

An employee shall substantially comply with all the directions of his employer concerning the service on which he is engaged, except where such obedience is impossible or unlawful, or would impose new and unreasonable burdens upon the employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2857.

An employee shall perform his service in conformity to the usage of the place of performance, unless otherwise directed by his employer, or unless it is impracticable or manifestly injurious to his employer to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2858.

An employee is bound to exercise a reasonable degree of skill, unless his employer has notice, before employing him, of his want of skill.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2859.

An employee is always bound to use such skill as he possesses, so far as the same is required, for the service specified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2860.

Everything which an employee acquires by virtue of his employment, except the compensation which is due to him from his employer, belongs to the employer, whether acquired lawfully or unlawfully, or during or after the expiration of the term of his employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2861.

An employee shall, on demand, render to his employer just accounts of all his transactions in the course of his service, as often as is reasonable, and shall, without demand, give prompt notice to his employer of everything which he receives for the account of the employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2862.

An employee who receives anything on account of his employer, in any capacity other than that of a mere servant, is not bound to deliver it to the employer until demanded, and is not at liberty to send it to the employer from a distance, without demand, in any mode involving greater risk than its retention by the employee himself.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2863.

An employee who has any business to transact on his own account, similar to that intrusted to him by his employer, shall always give the preference to the business of the employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2864.

An employee who is expressly authorized to employ a substitute is liable to his principal only for want of ordinary care in his selection. The substitute is directly responsible to the principal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2865.

An employee who is guilty of a culpable degree of negligence is liable to his employer for the damage thereby caused to the employer. The employer is liable to the employee if the service is not gratuitous, for the value of the services only as are properly rendered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2866.

Where service is to be rendered by two or more persons jointly, and one of them dies, the survivor shall act alone, if the service to be rendered is such as he can rightly perform without the aid of the deceased person, but not otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Inventions Made by an Employee [2870. - 2872.]

2870.

(a) Any provision in an employment agreement which provides that an employee shall assign, or offer to assign, any of his or her rights in an invention to his or her employer shall not apply to an invention that the employee developed entirely on his or her own time without using the employer’s equipment, supplies, facilities, or trade secret information except for those inventions that either: 

(1) Relate at the time of conception or reduction to practice of the invention to the employer’s business, or actual or demonstrably anticipated research or development of the employer; or 

(2) Result from any work performed by the employee for the employer. 

(b) To the extent a provision in an employment agreement purports to require an employee to assign an invention otherwise excluded from being required to be assigned under subdivision (a), the provision is against the public policy of this state and is unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 647, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2871.

No employer shall require a provision made void and unenforceable by Section 2870 as a condition of employment or continued employment. Nothing in this article shall be construed to forbid or restrict the right of an employer to provide in contracts of employment for disclosure, provided that any such disclosures be received in confidence, of all of the employee’s inventions made solely or jointly with others during the term of his or her employment, a review process by the employer to determine such issues as may arise, and for full title to certain patents and inventions to be in the United States, as required by contracts between the employer and the United States or any of its agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1001.)
-------------------------------------------

2872.

If an employment agreement entered into after January 1, 1980, contains a provision requiring the employee to assign or offer to assign any of his or her rights in any invention to his or her employer, the employer must also, at the time the agreement is made, provide a written notification to the employee that the agreement does not apply to an invention which qualifies fully under the provisions of Section 2870. In any suit or action arising thereunder, the burden of proof shall be on the employee claiming the benefits of its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Termination of Employment [2920. - 2929.]

2920.

Every employment is terminated by any of the following:

(a) Expiration of its appointed term.

(b) Extinction of its subject.

(c) Death of the employee.

(d) The employee’s legal incapacity to act as such.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2921.

Every employment in which the power of the employee is not coupled with an interest in its subject is terminated by notice to the employee of either of the following:

(a) The death of the employer.

(b) The legal incapacity of the employer to contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2922.

An employment, having no specified term, may be terminated at the will of either party on notice to the other. Employment for a specified term means an employment for a period greater than one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.

An employee, unless the term of his service has expired or unless he has a right to discontinue it at any time without notice, shall continue his service after notice of the death or incapacity of his employer, so far as is necessary to protect from serious injury the interests of the employer’s successor in interest, until a reasonable time after notice of the facts has been communicated to such successor. The successor shall compensate the employee for such service according to the terms of the contract of employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.

An employment for a specified term may be terminated at any time by the employer in case of any willful breach of duty by the employee in the course of his employment, or in case of his habitual neglect of his duty or continued incapacity to perform it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

2925.

An employment for a specified term may be terminated by the employee at any time in case of any wilful or permanent breach of the obligations of his employer to him as an employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2926.

An employee who is not employed for a specified term and who is dismissed by his employer is entitled to compensation for services rendered up to the time of such dismissal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2927.

An employee who is not employed for a specified term and who quits the service of his employer is entitled to compensation for services rendered up to the time of such quitting.
